Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-535
Policy; coverage for nonowned vehicle.

Such motor vehicle liability policy shall insure the person named as insured therein against loss from the liability imposed upon him by law for damages arising out of the use by him of any motor vehicle not owned by him, within the same territorial limits and subject to the same limits of liability as are set forth in section 60-534 with respect to a motor vehicle liability policy.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 35, p. 496;

Laws 1965, c. 389, § 2, p. 1246.

This section applies only to policies which have been filed with the Nebraska Department of Motor Vehicles and certified as proof of future financial responsibility pursuant to the requirements of the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act. Allied Mut. Ins. Co. v. Musil, 242 Neb. 64, 493 N.W.2d 171 (1992).

This section controls over a conflicting exclusionary clause in operator's policy of liability insurance. Rudder v. American Standard Ins. Co. of Wisconsin, 187 Neb. 778, 194 N.W.2d 175 (1972).